Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 4

Regional Planning Regulations

13-3-401. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Plat” includes plat, plan, plot or replot;

“Regional planning commission” means any regional planning commission established by the department of economic and community development as provided by law, and includes any municipal planning commission designated by the department as the regional planning commission of a planning region composed of the territory of a single municipality, together with the territory adjoining but outside of such municipality, no part of which is outside the municipality's urban growth boundary or, if no such boundary exists, more than five (5) miles beyond the limits of such municipality;

“Road” or “roads” means, relates to and includes roads, streets, highways, avenues, boulevards, parkways, lanes or other ways or any part thereof;

“Subdivision” means, in any county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand seven hundred (32,700) nor more than thirty-two thousand seven hundred sixty (32,760), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the division of a tract or parcel of land into two (2) or more lots, sites or other divisions for the purpose, whether immediate or future, of sale or building development, and includes resubdivision and, when appropriate to the context, relates to the process of subdividing or to the land or area subdivided; provided, that “subdivision” does not include a division of any tract or parcel of land into two (2) or more tracts or parcels when such parts or parcels are five (5) acres or larger in size; and

“Subdivision” means, in all counties except those in subdivision (4)(A), the division of a tract or parcel of land into two (2) or more lots, sites, or other divisions requiring new street or utility construction, or any division of less than five (5) acres for the purpose, whether immediate or future, of sale or building development, and includes resubdivision and, when appropriate to the context, relates to the process of resubdividing or to the land or area subdivided;

As used in subdivision (4)(B)(i), “utility construction” does not include the mere extension of individual service pipes or lines for the purpose of directly connecting a single lot, site or other division to existing utility mains.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 6, C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.9 (Williams, § 3493.15); impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; Acts 1976, ch. 692, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-301; Acts 1984, ch. 961, §§ 1, 3; 1985, ch. 149, § 1; 1988, ch. 597, § 1; 1998, ch. 1101, § 26; 2008, ch. 746, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

“Regional planning commission” defined, § 13-7-113.

“Subdivision” defined for municipal planning regulation purposes, § 13-4-301.

Zoning regulations in metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

Attorney General Opinions. Definition of “subdivision” for regional planning purposes, OAG 97-167, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 182 (12/16/97).

The establishment of a horizontal property regime under the Horizontal Property Act, T.C.A. §§ 66-27-101 to 66-27-123, does not constitute a subdivision of property; therefore, if a property owner complies with the act's provisions for establishing a horizontal property regime, the property owner need not seek the regional planning commission's approval under the statutes governing subdivisions, T.C.A. §§ 13-3-401 to 13-3-411, OAG 01-147, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 155 (9/14/01).

Regional planning commission's authority in urban growth areas. OAG 13-31, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (4/18/13).

13-3-402. Regional planning commission platting authority — Recording plat by county register — Variances.

From and after the time when the regional planning commission of any region, as defined and created by the department of economic and community development, has adopted a regional plan which includes at least a major road plan or has progressed in its planning to the state of the making and adoption of a major road plan, and has filed a certified copy of such major road plan in the office or offices of the county register or registers of the county or counties lying in whole or in part in such region, then no plat of a subdivision of land within such region, other than land located within the boundaries of any municipal corporation, shall be filed for record or recorded until it has been approved by such regional planning commission or the staff of the regional planning commission if this responsibility has been delegated to the staff by the regional planning commission as provided in subsection (c), and such approval endorsed in writing on the plat by the secretary of the commission or by another designee of the regional planning commission; provided, that if the plat of subdivision divides the tract into no more than two (2) lots, the approval may be endorsed in writing on the plat by the secretary of the commission or by another designee of the regional planning commission without the approval of the regional planning commission, upon certification by the planning staff of the regional planning commission that the subdivision complies with such regulations governing a subdivision of land as have been adopted by the regional planning commission pursuant to § 13-3-403; provided further, that no request for variance from such regulations has been requested.

No plat shall be submitted to or approved by the regional planning commission or the staff of the regional planning commission if this responsibility has been delegated to the staff by the regional planning commission as provided in subsection (c) unless it is submitted by the owner of the property to be subdivided by the plat, or a governmental entity. “Owner,” for purposes of this section, means the legal or beneficial owner or owners of all the land proposed to be included in the proposed subdivision, or the holder of a written option or contract to purchase the land, or the attorney or authorized representative of any of the aforementioned.

No county register shall receive, file or record a plat of a subdivision, or an amendment, modification, or correction to a recorded plat of a subdivision, without the approval of the regional planning commission when and as required by this part. Each such plat so filed shall include the most recent recorded deed book number and page number for each deed constituting part of the property being platted. Notwithstanding this subsection (b), an easement or survey attached to an easement granted to the state, a county, municipality, metropolitan government, or entity of the state, county, municipality or metropolitan government, shall not constitute an amendment, modification, or correction of a recorded plat of a subdivision.

A regional planning commission may delegate the responsibility for approval of a subdivision plat to the staff of the regional planning commission by a majority vote of the regional planning commission that is taken in a public meeting after being placed on the regional planning commission's meeting agenda and notice being provided as required for other matters before the regional planning commission.

A regional planning commission may grant variances to subdivision regulations, if such variances are adopted at a public meeting of the commission.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.10; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; Acts 1976, ch. 803, § 1; 1977, ch. 267, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-302; Acts 1981, ch. 73, § 1; 1988, ch. 554, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 2004, ch. 576, § 2; 2006, ch. 547, § 1; 2006, ch. 644, §§ 1, 3, 5; 2018, ch. 1000, §§ 2-4.

Cross-References. Cooperative planning agreements, title 54, ch. 18, part 1.

Plans for street and highway systems, title 54, ch. 18, part 2.

Submission of subdivision plats to commission for approval — Filing and recording, § 13-4-302.

Attorney General Opinions. No statute of general applicability authorizes a county commission to enact a resolution requiring a county register to accept for filing the plat of a subdivision that has not been approved by the regional planning commission, OAG 07-121, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 121 (8/16/07).

No statute of general applicability authorizes a county commission to exempt a subdivision from approval by the regional planning commission, OAG 07-121, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 121 (8/16/07).

13-3-403. Platting regulations — Road and utility main regulations — Completion bond — Hearing on regulations.

In exercising the powers granted to it by § 13-3-402, the regional planning commission shall adopt regulations governing the subdivision of land within its jurisdiction. Such regulations may provide for the harmonious development of the region and its environs; for the coordination of roads within the subdivided land with other existing or planned roads or with the state or regional plan or with the plans of municipalities in or near the region; for adequate open spaces for traffic, light, air and recreation; for the conservation of or production of adequate transportation, water, drainage and sanitary facilities; for the avoidance of population congestion; and for the avoidance of such scattered or premature subdivision of land as would involve danger or injury to health, safety or prosperity by reason of the lack of water supply, drainage, transportation or other public services or would necessitate an excessive expenditure of public funds for the supply of such services or would be located in areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined the services are necessary in order for development to occur.

As a condition precedent to the final approval of the plat, the regulations may include infrastructure improvement requirements as to the extent to which and the manner in which:

Roads are constructed and improved;

Water, sewer, and other utility mains, piping, and connections are constructed or installed; or

Other infrastructure and facilities are constructed or installed.

The regulations of the regional planning commission may provide for the preliminary approval of the plat before the infrastructure improvements, but any preliminary approval shall not be entered on the plat.

In lieu of the completion of the infrastructure improvements before the final approval of a subdivision plat, the regional planning commission may grant final plat approval subject to the submittal and acceptance of a bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance, in form, in amount, and with conditions and surety satisfactory to the regional planning commission. The bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance shall provide for and secure to the public and the local government the actual construction and installation of the infrastructure improvements within a period specified by the regional planning commission and expressed in the bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance.

The attorney for the county shall enforce any bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance by all appropriate legal and equitable remedies, and moneys collected on the bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance shall be paid into the county's treasury. Upon the order of the regional planning commission, the moneys shall be applied to the construction and installation of the infrastructure improvements.

Before adoption of its subdivision regulations or any amendment thereof, a public hearing thereon shall be held by the regional planning commission, thirty (30) days' notice of the time and place of which shall be given by one (1) publication in a newspaper of general circulation in each county lying wholly or partly in the region.

The adoption of subdivision regulations or an amendment to existing subdivision regulations proposed by a regional planning commission shall not be given effect unless approved:

By the county legislative body of each county lying wholly or partly within the region and by the governing body of each municipality lying wholly or partly within the region;

By only the legislative body of the county that is regulated by those subdivision regulations, if the subdivision regulations apply only to land outside of any municipality within the region; or

By only the governing body of the municipality that is regulated by those subdivision regulations, if the subdivision regulations apply only to land within municipal boundaries.

This subdivision (c)(2) applies to a regional planning commission if the legislative body of each county and municipality lying wholly or partly within the region adopts a resolution or ordinance requiring approval of the regional planning commission's subdivision regulations or amendments to existing subdivision regulations.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.11; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-303; Acts 1998, ch. 1080, § 7; 2008, ch. 1150, § 5; 2009, ch. 35, § 1; 2011, ch. 73, § 1; 2015, ch. 209, § 1; 2018, ch. 1000, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. The County Powers Relief Act would not preclude the amendment of T.C.A. § 13-3-403(b) to include schools as “facilities,” the installation of which may be required as a condition precedent to subdivision plat approval; nevertheless, such amendment would appear to conflict with the spirit and express language of that act, OAG 07-153, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 153 (11/21/07).

Regional planning commission's authority in urban growth areas. OAG 13-31, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (4/18/13).

13-3-404. Procedure upon submission of plats — Procedure in certain counties.

The regional planning commission shall approve or disapprove a plat within sixty (60) days after the initial consideration of the plat by the regional planning commission meeting in a regularly scheduled session, unless at the end of the sixty-day period there is a holiday or an unexpected interceding event that would close municipal or county government offices and thus affect the normal computation of the sixty-day period, in which case the plat shall be approved or disapproved after the interrupted sixty-day period at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the regional planning commission; otherwise, the plat shall be deemed approved and a certificate to that effect shall be issued by the commission on demand. The applicant for the commission's approval may waive the time requirement set in this subsection (a) and consent to an extension or extensions of the applicable time period. When a plat has been filed with the appropriate officials of the planning commission, the plat shall be placed on the agenda of the planning commission within thirty (30) days of the filing or the next regularly scheduled planning commission meeting after the thirty-day period. The applicant may waive the time frame requirement for the appearance of the plat on the agenda. The ground of disapproval of any plat shall be stated upon the records of the commission. Any plat submitted to the commission shall contain the name and address of a person to whom notice of hearing may be sent; and no plat shall be acted upon by the commission without affording a hearing thereon, notice of the time and place of which shall be sent by mail to the address not less than five (5) days before the date fixed for such hearing.

In incorporated municipalities located within any county having a population of not less than three hundred twenty-five thousand (325,000) nor more than four hundred thousand (400,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, if the regional planning commission approves or disapproves a plat after a hearing thereon, then the applicant submitting the plat or any person who was a party for or against the plat request at the planning commission hearing shall have the right within thirty (30) days after such approval or disapproval to have the action of the regional planning commission reviewed by the municipal legislative body having jurisdiction over the plat in question, which shall by majority vote approve or disapprove the plat. If the plat is approved, then the secretary of the regional planning commission shall endorse the plat for recording as prescribed in § 13-3-402. No such plat shall be recorded until after the municipal legislative body has acted on a request for a review of the action of the planning commission if there is a request within thirty (30) days.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-304; Acts 1973, ch. 402, § 1; 1993, ch. 313, § 1; 2001, ch. 295, § 1; 2008, ch. 984, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section was amended by Acts 1973, ch. 402, § 1 with respect to Knox County only.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-3-405. Plat approval not acceptance of road.

The approval of a plat by the regional planning commission shall not be deemed to constitute or effect an acceptance by any county or by the public of the dedication of any road or other ground shown upon the plat.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-305.

13-3-406. Acceptance of and improvements of unapproved roads.

From and after the time when the platting jurisdiction of any regional planning commission of any region has attached by virtue of the making and adoption of a major road plan as provided in § 13-3-402, no county or court or board or officer thereof or any other public officer or authority shall accept, lay out, open, improve, grade, pave or light any road or lay or authorize water mains or sewers or connections or other facilities or utilities to be laid in any road located within such region and outside of the boundaries of municipal corporations, unless such road has been accepted or opened or has otherwise received the legal status of a public road prior to the attachment of the planning commission's jurisdiction, or unless such road corresponds in its location and lines with a road shown on a subdivision plat approved by the planning commission or on a road plat made and adopted by the planning commission; provided, that the county legislative body of such county may accept or lay out any other road or adopt any other road location; provided further, that the resolution or other measure for such acceptance, laying out or adoption is first submitted to the planning commission for its approval and, if disapproved by the commission, receives the favorable vote of not less than a majority of the entire membership of the county legislative body; and a road approved by the planning commission upon such submission, or accepted, laid out, or adopted by the commission, shall have the status of an approved road location as fully as though it had been originally shown on a subdivision plat approved by the planning commission or on a plat made and adopted by the planning commission. In the case, however, of any state highway constructed or to be constructed in the region by the state of Tennessee with state funds as a part of the state highway system, the submission to the planning commission shall be by the commissioner of transportation, who shall have the power to overrule the disapproval of the planning commission.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.14; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-306.

13-3-407. Applicability of part.

This part shall not apply to any subdivision, the plat of which has been registered prior to February 14, 1935.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.15 (Williams, § 3493.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-307.

13-3-408. Divisions and plats partitioned by court excepted.

This part shall not apply to division and plats of land partitioned by a court of competent jurisdiction. However, plats filed under § 13-3-402 shall contain the information required by § 13-3-402 even though the land has been partitioned by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.16 (Williams, § 3493.17); Acts 1976, ch. 803, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-308; Acts 2009, ch. 77, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. This section does not apply where a regional planning commission has been designated to act as a municipality's planning authority, OAG 87-118, 1987 Tenn. AG LEXIS 84 (7/20/87).

Developer may fall within exception, OAG 97-167, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 182 (12/16/97).

13-3-409. Private acts relating to subdivision of lands — Effect.

This part shall not be construed as repealing or impairing any provision of any private act relating to the approval or regulation by the municipal authorities of the cities therein specified of the subdivision of land or the filing of plans, plots or replots of land lying within the distance therein specified beyond the corporate limits of such cities, or of any private act relating to the jurisdiction of any county planning commission of the county therein specified.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.17 (Williams, § 3493.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-309.

13-3-410. Penalties for transferring lots in unrecorded subdivisions.

The owner or the agent of the owner of any land shall not:

Transfer, sell, agree to sell, or negotiate to sell the land by reference to, exhibition of, or by other use of a subdivision plat without first submitting a final subdivision plat to the regional planning commission and receiving the commission's approval and before the final plat is recorded in the appropriate register's office; or

Falsely represent to a prospective purchaser of the land that roads or streets will be constructed by a county or other political subdivision.

The description by metes and bounds in the instrument of transfer or other document used in the sale or transfer does not exempt the transaction from a violation of this subsection (a). The county, through the county attorney or other official designated by the legislative body, may pursue an injunction or other appropriate remedy for a violation of this subsection (a).

The owner or agent of the owner of any land may sell, transfer, or agree to sell any lot or lots shown on a plat only after that plat has been given final plat approval by the regional planning commission, and after the approved final plat is recorded in the office of the appropriate county register. The regional planning commission may grant final plat approval where the infrastructure improvements such as roads, water, sewer, utilities, other infrastructures, and facilities are not completed and accepted by the appropriate entities. For the regional planning commission to grant final approval, the owner or agent of the owner of the land to be granted final approval shall post a bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance in form, in amount, and with conditions and surety satisfactory to the regional planning commission. The bond, letter of credit, or other method of assurance shall provide for and secure to the public and the county the actual construction and installation of the infrastructure improvements within a period specified by the regional planning commission.

The remedies and penalties provided by this chapter are to be applied exclusively to the owner or agent of the owner. Title to any tract conveyed without compliance with this chapter is not affected by this chapter unless the sale or transfer has been enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction prior to the conveyance being recorded in the office of the appropriate county register. While the title to any such tract is not affected by this chapter, the tract remains otherwise subject to all provisions of this chapter.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 10, as added by Acts 1951, ch. 222, § 2 (Williams, § 3493.19); 1959, ch. 132, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-310; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1993, ch. 203, § 1; 2015, ch. 209, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. A transfer that is not made by reference to or exhibition of or by other use of a plat of subdivision of such land is not subject to T.C.A. § 13-3-410(a), OAG 07-121, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 121 (8/16/07).

Correction of recorded subdivision plat. OAG 13-17, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (3/5/13).

Regional planning commission's authority in urban growth areas. OAG 13-31, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (4/18/13).

13-3-411. Prerequisites for issuing building permits or erecting buildings — Proposed permanent easements.

From and after the time when the platting jurisdiction of any regional planning commission has attached as provided in § 13-3-402, no building permit shall be issued and no building shall be erected on any lot within the region, unless one (1) of the following four (4) criteria is met:

The street giving access to the lot upon which the building is proposed to be placed has been accepted or opened as, or shall have otherwise, received the legal status of, a public street prior to that time;

The street corresponds in its location and lines with a street shown on a subdivision plat approved by the planning commission and recorded in the register of deeds; and

Whenever the street or other infrastructure improvements as denoted on the plat have not been completed, there shall be an adequate, valid, and enforceable bond, or an adequate, valid, and enforceable other guarantee for the completion of the improvements, which shall be held by the appropriate officials as provided in § 13-3-403. This subdivision (a)(2)(B) shall not be construed to require duplicate bonds or to require additional bonds when an adequate bond to complete the infrastructure is already in effect. This subdivision (a)(2)(B) shall not be construed as requiring a building contractor to post the bond required by § 13-3-403 on the infrastructure for the subdivision if such building contractor is not a developer of the subdivision;

The lot fronts upon a permanent easement which conforms to all rules, regulations and specifications applicable to the permanent easement of the planning commission or other department, division or agency of the county; provided, that such rules, regulations, and specifications governing permanent easements shall not take effect until such rules, regulations, and specifications are approved by the county legislative body in a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote; and

The permanent easement has access to an existing highway, street or thoroughfare, or with a street located or accepted by the county legislative body after submission to the planning commission, and in case of the planning commission's disapproval, by the favorable vote of the county legislative body required in § 13-3-406; or

The street corresponds in its location and lines with a street shown on a street plat made and adopted by the commission.

The planning commission or other department, division or agency of a county as approved by the planning commission may recommend to the county legislative body regulations to govern a proposed permanent easement in a proposed subdivision, as defined in § 13-3-401. The purpose of the regulations is to ensure that the county is not responsible for the future maintenance of such permanent easement.

Any building erected or to be erected in violation of this section is an unlawful structure, and the state building commission or the county attorney or other official designated by the county legislative body may institute a civil action to enjoin such erection or cause it to be vacated or removed.

Acts 1935, ch. 35, § 11, as added by Acts 1951, ch. 222, § 2 (Williams, § 3493.20); Acts 1972, ch. 681, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-311; Acts 1994, ch. 816, § 1; 2014, ch. 914, §§ 1, 2, 4.

13-3-412. New subdivision developments in the vicinity of established sport shooting ranges.

For any new subdivision development that is located in whole or in part within one thousand feet (1,000') of any portion of the outside boundary of any land on which is contained a sport shooting range that was established, by clear and convincing evidence, constructed or operated prior to the development of the subdivision, the owner of the development shall provide on any plat filed with the appropriate municipal or county official, or both, the following notice:

Sport Shooting Range Area

This property is located in the vicinity of an established sport shooting range. It can be anticipated that customary uses and activities at this shooting range will be conducted now and in the future. The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience that may result from these uses and activities.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Established” means a sport shooting range that is known by custom, reputation or otherwise to exist within a community or area prior to the time of the proposed subdivision development. Indicia of a sport shooting range being “established” are:

The range is listed in the area telephone book;

The range is, from time to time, advertised in the yellow pages of a telephone book, newspapers, billboards or flyers;

There are directional signs on public roads, streets or highways indicating the correct route to the shooting range;

The range is indicated on a road or other map of the area that predates the proposed subdivision development;

The shooting range is listed with the better business bureau or chamber of commerce of the area in which it is located; or

The owner of the range has a business license on file with the appropriate clerk; and

“Sport shooting range” or “range” means an area designed and operated for the use of rifles, shotguns, pistols, silhouettes, skeet, trap, black powder, or any other similar sport shooting.

This section shall only apply to counties that have a planning commission and subdivision regulations.

Acts 2004, ch. 494, § 1.